Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska79-858
Other agreements; responsibility.

Any agreements other than the Retirement Incentive Plan pursuant to section 79-855 or Staff Development Assistance pursuant to section 79-856 shall be the sole responsibility of the unified system or reorganized district.

Laws 1996, LB 1050, § 37;

Laws 1998, LB 1219, § 8.